Hawaii statutes.
[§662D-2] Scope of immunity.
(a) A volunteer shall be immune from civil liability in any action on the
basis of any act or omission of a volunteer resulting in damage or injury if:

(1) The volunteer was acting in good faith and within
the scope of the volunteer's official functions and duties for a nonprofit
organization, a nonprofit corporation, a hospital, or a governmental entity;

(2) The damage or injury was caused by the
volunteer's negligent conduct; and

(3) With respect to a nonprofit organization,
nonprofit corporation, or hospital, the entity for which the volunteer was
acting either:

(A) Has a general liability policy in force,
both at the time of injury and at the time the claim is made against the
entity, and the minimum coverage is in an amount of not less than: $200,000
per occurrence and $500,000 aggregate; or

(B) Has total assets, exclusive of grants and
allocations, of less than $50,000.

(b) In any suit against a nonprofit
organization, a nonprofit corporation, a hospital, or a governmental entity for
civil damages based upon the negligent act or omission of a volunteer, proof of
the act or omission shall be sufficient to establish the responsibility of the
entity therefor under the doctrine of respondeat superior, notwithstanding the
immunity granted to the volunteer with respect to any act or omission included
under subsection (a). [L 1997, c 351, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next